Oklahoma, session 2026, SB2090.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1277, as


amended by Section 2, Chapter 251, O.S.L. 2025 (21 O.S. Supp. 2025,


Section 1277), is amended to read as follows:


Section 1277.


UNLAWFUL CARRY IN CERTAIN PLACES


A. It shall be unlawful for any person, including a person in


possession of a valid handgun license issued pursuant to the



Req. No. 3455 Page 1


provisions of the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act, to carry any concealed


or unconcealed firearm into any of the following places:


1. Any building or office space which is owned or leased by a


city, town, county, or state governmental authority for the purpose


of conducting business with the public. However, the governing body


of a city or town may authorize the concealed carry of handguns into


any building or office space that is owned or leased by a city or


town, except those places listed in paragraph 2 of this subsection;


2. Any courthouse, courtroom, prison, jail, detention facility,


or any facility used to process, hold, or house arrested persons,


prisoners, or persons alleged delinquent or adjudicated delinquent,


except as provided in Section 21 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


3. Any public or private elementary or public or private


secondary school, except as provided in subsections C and D of this


section;


4. Any publicly owned or operated sports arena or venue during


a professional sporting event, unless allowed by the event holder;


5. Any place where gambling is authorized by law, unless


allowed by the property owner;


6. Any other place specifically prohibited by law; and


7. Any property set aside by a county, city, town, public trust


with a county, city, or town as a beneficiary, or state governmental


authority for an event that is secured with minimum security

Req. No. 3455 Page 2


provisions. For purposes of this paragraph, a minimum security


provision consists of a location that is secured utilizing the


following:


a. a metallic-style security fence that is at least eight


(8) feet in height that encompasses the property and


is secured in such a way as to deter unauthorized


entry,


b. controlled access points staffed by a uniformed,


commissioned peace officer, and


c. a metal detector whereby persons walk or otherwise


travel with their property through or by the metal


detector.


B. It shall be lawful for a person to carry a concealed or


unconcealed firearm on the following properties:


1. Any property set aside for the use or parking of any


vehicle, whether attended or unattended, by a city, town, county, or


state governmental authority;


2. Any property set aside for the use or parking of any


vehicle, whether attended or unattended, which is open to the


public, or by any entity engaged in gambling authorized by law;


3. Any property adjacent to a building or office space in which


concealed or unconcealed weapons are prohibited by the provisions of


this section;



Req. No. 3455 Page 3


4. Any property designated by a city, town, county, or state


governmental authority as a park, recreational area, wildlife


refuge, wildlife management area, or fairgrounds; provided, nothing


in this paragraph shall be construed to authorize any entry by a


person in possession of a concealed or unconcealed firearm into any


building, office space, or event which is specifically prohibited by


the provisions of subsection A of this section;


5. Any property set aside by a public or private elementary or


secondary school for the use or parking of any vehicle, whether


attended or unattended; provided, however, the firearm shall be


stored and hidden from view in a locked motor vehicle when the motor


vehicle is left unattended on school property; and


6. Any public property set aside temporarily by a county, city,


town, public trust with a county, city, or town as a beneficiary, or


state governmental authority for the holder of an event permit that


is without minimum security provisions, as such term is defined in


paragraph 7 of subsection A of this section; provided, the carry of


firearms within the permitted event area shall be limited to


concealed carry of a handgun unless otherwise authorized by the


holder of the event permit.


Nothing contained in any provision of this subsection or


subsection C of this section shall be construed to authorize or


allow any person in control of any place described in subsection A


of this section to establish any policy or rule that has the effect

Req. No. 3455 Page 4


of prohibiting any person in lawful possession of a handgun license


or otherwise in lawful possession of a firearm from carrying or


possessing the firearm on the property described in this subsection.


C. A concealed or unconcealed weapon may be carried onto


private school property or in any school bus or vehicle used by any


private school for transportation of students or teachers by a


person who is licensed pursuant to the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act,


provided a policy has been adopted by the governing entity of the


private school that authorizes the carrying and possession of a


weapon on private school property or in any school bus or vehicle


used by a private school. Except for acts of gross negligence or


willful or wanton misconduct, a governing entity of a private school


that adopts a policy which authorizes the possession of a weapon on


private school property, a school bus, or a vehicle used by the


private school shall not be subject to liability for any injuries


arising from the adoption of the policy. The provisions of this


subsection shall not apply to claims pursuant to the Administrative


Workers’ Compensation Act.


D. Notwithstanding paragraph 3 of subsection A of this section,


a A board of education of a school district may adopt a policy


pursuant to Section 5-149.2 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes to


authorize the carrying of a handgun onto school property by school


personnel specifically designated by the board of education,


provided such personnel either:

Req. No. 3455 Page 5


1. Possess a valid armed security guard license as provided for


in the Oklahoma Security Guard and Private Investigator Act; or


2. Hold a valid reserve peace officer certification as provided


for in Section 3311 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to restrict


authority granted elsewhere in law to carry firearms.


E. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection A of this


section, on any property designated as a municipal zoo or park of


any size that is owned, leased, operated, or managed by:


1. A public trust created pursuant to the provisions of Section


176 of Title 60 of the Oklahoma Statutes; or


2. A nonprofit entity,


an individual shall be allowed to carry a concealed handgun but not


openly carry a handgun on the property.


F. Any person violating the provisions of paragraph 2 or 3 of


subsection A of this section shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a


misdemeanor punishable by a fine not to exceed Two Hundred Fifty


Dollars ($250.00). A person violating any other provision of


subsection A of this section may be denied entrance onto the


property or removed from the property. If the person refuses to


leave the property and a peace officer is summoned, the person may


be issued a citation for an amount not to exceed Two Hundred Fifty


Dollars ($250.00).



Req. No. 3455 Page 6


G. No person in possession of a valid handgun license issued


pursuant to the provisions of the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act or who


is carrying or in possession of a firearm as otherwise permitted by


law or who is carrying or in possession of a machete, blackjack,


loaded cane, hand chain, or metal knuckles shall be authorized to


carry the firearm, machete, blackjack, loaded cane, hand chain, or


metal knuckles into or upon any college, university, or technology


center school property, except as provided in this subsection. For


purposes of this subsection, the following property shall not be


construed to be college, university, or technology center school


property:


1. Any property set aside for the use or parking of any motor


vehicle, whether attended or unattended, provided the firearm,


machete, blackjack, loaded cane, hand chain, or metal knuckles are


carried or stored as required by law and the firearm, machete,


blackjack, loaded cane, hand chain, or metal knuckles are not


removed from the motor vehicle without the prior consent of the


college or university president or technology center school


administrator while the vehicle is on any college, university, or


technology center school property; person in possession of a valid


handgun license issued pursuant to the provisions of the Oklahoma


Self-Defense Act shall be authorized to carry a concealed handgun


into or upon any public college, university, or technology center


school building or property in which or on which the person is

Req. No. 3455 Page 7


authorized to be. Under no circumstances shall consent to carry a


concealed handgun by a person with a valid handgun license on any


public college, university, or technology center school building or


property be denied by the public college, university, or technology


center school administrator unless evidence is shown that the


licensee has previously been involved in a violent incident or an


act that showed deliberate or reckless disregard for the health or


safety of the faculty, staff, students, or any other person.


2. Any property authorized for possession or use of firearms,


machetes, blackjacks, loaded canes, hand chains, or metal knuckles


by college, university, or technology center school policy; and A


public college, university, or technology center school may prohibit


any person who is or is not in possession of a valid handgun license


issued pursuant to the provisions of the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act


from carrying a concealed handgun or any other firearm into any


event venue where a ticket of monetary value is required for entry


on the property or in the venue of the public college, university,


or technology center school during the event.


3. Any property authorized by the written consent of the


college or university president or technology center school


administrator, provided the written consent is carried with the


firearm, machete, blackjack, loaded cane, hand chain, or metal


knuckles and the valid handgun license while on college, university,


or technology center school property.

Req. No. 3455 Page 8


The college, university, or technology center school may notify


the Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation within ten (10) days of a


violation of any provision of this subsection by a licensee. Upon


receipt of a written notification of violation, the Bureau shall


give a reasonable notice to the licensee and hold a hearing. At the


hearing, upon a determination that the licensee has violated any


provision of this subsection, the licensee may be subject to an


administrative fine of Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00) and may


have the handgun license suspended for three (3) months.


Nothing contained in any provision of this subsection shall be


construed to authorize or allow any college, university, or


technology center school to establish any policy or rule that has


the effect of prohibiting any person in lawful possession of a


handgun license or any person in lawful possession of a firearm,


machete, blackjack, loaded cane, hand chain, or metal knuckles from


possession of a firearm, machete, blackjack, loaded cane, hand


chain, or metal knuckles in places described in paragraphs 1, 2, and


of this subsection. For purposes of this subsection, “event venue”


means the venue of any athletic, theatrical, musical, or similar


event in which a ticket of monetary value is required for entry.


Nothing contained in any provision of this subsection shall be


construed to limit the authority of any college, university, or


technology center school in this state from taking administrative



Req. No. 3455 Page 9


action against any student for any violation of any provision of


this subsection.


H. Except for gross negligence or acts of willful or wanton


misconduct, any public or private college, university, or technology


center school shall be immune from any liability arising from any


accidental or self-defense act involving a firearm. The provisions


of this subsection shall not apply to claims pursuant to the


Administrative Workers’ Compensation Act.


I. Nothing contained in the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act shall be


construed to limit, restrict, or prohibit in any manner the existing


rights of a private college, university, or technology center school


to control the possession of weapons on any property owned or


controlled by the private college, university, or technology center


school. Nothing contained in any provision of this subsection shall


be construed to limit the authority of any private college,


university, or technology center school in this state from taking


administrative action against any person for any violation of any


provision of this subsection.


J. It shall not be considered part of an employee’s job


description or within the employee’s scope of employment when an


employee carries or discharges a firearm pursuant to this section.


K. Nothing in this section shall prevent a public or private


college, university, technology center school, employee, or person


who has suffered loss resulting from the discharge of a firearm to

Req. No. 3455 Page 10


seek redress or damages from the person who discharged or used the


firearm outside the provisions of the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act.


L. No public or private college, university, or technology


center school shall be liable for any loss or damage of any firearm


or accessories at any time.


M. The provisions of this section shall not apply to the


following:


1. Any peace officer or any person authorized by law to carry a


firearm in the course of employment;


2. Any district judge, associate district judge, or special


district judge, who is in possession of a valid handgun license


issued pursuant to the provisions of the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act


and whose name appears on a list maintained by the Administrative


Director of the Courts, when acting in the course and scope of


employment within the courthouses of the county that falls within


the jurisdiction of the district judge, associate district judge, or


special district judge;


3. Any private investigator with a firearms authorization when


acting in the course and scope of employment;


4. Any elected official of a county, who is in possession of a


valid handgun license issued pursuant to the provisions of the


Oklahoma Self-Defense Act, may carry a concealed handgun when acting


in the performance of his or her duties within the courthouses of


the county in which he or she was elected. The provisions of this

Req. No. 3455 Page 11


paragraph shall not allow the elected county official to carry the


handgun into a courtroom;


5. The sheriff of any county may authorize certain employees of


the county, who possess a valid handgun license issued pursuant to


the provisions of the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act, to carry a


concealed handgun when acting in the course and scope of employment


within the courthouse in the county in which the person is employed.


Nothing in the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act shall prohibit the sheriff


from requiring additional instruction or training before granting


authorization to carry a concealed handgun within the courthouse.


The provisions of this paragraph and of paragraph 6 of this


subsection shall not allow the county employee to carry the handgun


into a courtroom, sheriff’s office, adult or juvenile jail, or any


other prisoner detention area;


6. The board of county commissioners of any county may


authorize certain employees of the county, who possess a valid


handgun license issued pursuant to the provisions of the Oklahoma


Self-Defense Act, to carry a concealed handgun when acting in the


course and scope of employment on county annex facilities or grounds


surrounding the county courthouse that fall within the jurisdiction


of the county employees; and


7. Any municipal judge, who is in possession of a valid handgun


license issued pursuant to the provisions of the Oklahoma Self-


Defense Act, when acting in the course and scope of employment

Req. No. 3455 Page 12


within the courthouses of the municipality that are within the


jurisdiction of the municipal judge.


I. N. 1. Any elected official of a municipality or any


municipal employee approved by the governing body of a municipality,


who possesses a valid handgun license issued pursuant to the


provisions of the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act, may carry a concealed


handgun when acting in the performance of his or her official duties


within municipal buildings that are within the jurisdiction of the


elected official or municipal employee.


2. For purposes of this subsection, a firearm may not be


present inside a firearm-prohibited location, which shall include:


a. any building or office space on municipally owned or


leased property designated as a firearm-prohibited


location by the municipality, municipal trust, or


municipal authority, and


b. any police department, courthouse, courtroom, prison,


jail, detention facility, or any facility used to


process, hold, or house arrested persons, prisoners,


or persons alleged delinquent or adjudicated


delinquent.


3. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to require an


elected official or designated employee of the municipality to carry


a firearm as a condition of employment or service with the


municipality.

Req. No. 3455 Page 13


J. O. For the purposes of this section, “motor vehicle” means


any automobile, truck, minivan, sport utility vehicle, or


motorcycle, as defined in Section 1-135 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma


Statutes, equipped with a locked accessory container within or


affixed to the motorcycle.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3455 BRC 1/15/2026 12:26:12 PM

































Req. No. 3455 Page 14